Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the  biennium
beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for  the following
purposes:
(1) Health Systems, Health
Policy and Analytics, and
Public Health .................... $ 2,671,494,755
(2) Oregon State Hospital ....... $ 657,352,948
(3) Central services,
state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ........ $ 239,595,870
(4) Capital improvement......... $ 785,452
(5) Debt service ...................... $ 59,443,640
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco
tax receipts, marijuana tax receipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and  Medicare
receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in this section, collected
or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for the following purposes:
(1) Health Systems, Health
Policy and Analytics, and
Public Health .................... $ 4,257,425,740
(2) Oregon State Hospital ....... $ 38,362,827
(3) Central services,
state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ........ $ 33,357,809
(4) Shared administrative
services ............................. $ 205,924,072
(5) Capital improvement......... $ 785,452
(6) Drug treatment and
recovery services .............. $ 302,193,109
Enrolled House Bill 5024 (HB 5024-A) Page 1
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic  De-
velopment Fund to the Oregon Health Authority, for the following purposes:
(1) Health Systems and Health
Policy and Analytics ......... $ 15,995,150
(2) Central services,
state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ........ $ 519,457
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,127,476 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys  allocated from the Veterans’ Services Fund es-
tablished under ORS 406.140 to the Oregon  Health Authority for veterans’ behavioral health
services.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in  section 2 of this 2021
Act, collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for the following purposes:
(1) Health Systems, Health
Policy and Analytics, and
Public Health .................... $ 16,802,446,373
(2) Oregon State Hospital ....... $ 28,392,941
(3) Central services,
state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ........ $ 69,477,135
SECTION 6.
For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, the following  expenditures by the
Oregon Health Authority are not limited:
(1) Expenditures from the Women, Infants and Children Program infant  formula rebate
system.
(2) Expenditures from the federal funds  Women, Infants and Children Program food
voucher redemptions.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$2,311,395,282 is established for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit
for payment of expenses by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board from the Public Employees’
Revolving Fund for benefit plan premiums and self-insurance.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,874,912,819 is established for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit
for payment of expenses by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board from the Oregon Educators
Revolving Fund for benefit plan premiums and self-insurance.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$65,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by  the Oregon Health Authority from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Oregon Health Authority, for  behavioral health
regional development and innovation.
SECTION 10. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $49,000,000, to be allocated to the Oregon Health Authority for
behavioral health system transformation and realignment activities.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2022, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
Enrolled House Bill 5024 (HB 5024-A) Page 2
SECTION 11. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $20,000,000, to be allocated to the Oregon Health Authority for
maintaining appropriate staffing levels at the Oregon State Hospital.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2022, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 12.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by House June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5024 (HB 5024-A) Page 3